New Jersey, session 222, S2593.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.46 (C.30:5B-31) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  The Commissioner of Human Services is authorized to establish criteria for determining financial and programmatic eligibility for child care services subsidized through State and federal funding sources, including provisions for the submission of proof of income and resources, and such other documentation as may be necessary to establish programmatic eligibility. The criteria established by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection shall provide that an applicant or participant who is a teacher or other school employee shall not be determined ineligible for subsidies due to the number of hours worked during weeks that fall outside of the school year.  A teacher or other school employee who qualifies for subsidies under this paragraph shall not be required to report to the Department of Human Services changes in the number of hours worked during weeks that fall outside of the school year, but shall be required to participate in any redetermination process required by the commissioner of all participants.  As used in this paragraph, school year means the part of the year in which a school or school district is in session for students. b.    The commissioner is authorized to establish resource limits and a sliding fee scale applicable to participants based on income guidelines for all families eligible for subsidized child care services.  In setting such fees, the commissioner shall give consideration to maximizing federal funding and to effectively utilizing all State and federal funding sources available for the purpose of subsidizing child care services in New Jersey. c.     The commissioner shall adopt such rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. (cf: P.L.1993, c.46, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month  next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.